Florida, session 2026, SB838.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 12 13 Section 1.âSection 520.105, Florida Statutes, is created to 14 read: 15 520.105âConvenience fee for processing electronic 16 payments.â 17 (1)âAs used in this section, the term: 18 (a)ââACH paymentâ means a payment made by an automated 19 clearing house electronic transfer from a retail buyerâs bank 20 account. 21 (b)ââElectronic paymentâ means a payment made by credit 22 card, debit card, electronic funds transfer, electronic check, 23 or other electronic method. 24 (2)âA holder of a retail installment contract, or its 25 agent, may collect a fee for processing a retail buyerâs 26 electronic payment under the retail installment contract, 27 provided that all of the following conditions are met: 28 (a)âThe fee is reasonably related to the actual expense 29 incurred by the holder or its agent in processing the electronic 30 payment. 31 (b)âThe holder or its agent does all of the following: 32 1.âAllows the retail buyer to make a payment by a method 33 other than a method that incurs a fee. 34 2.âMaintains an option for a retail buyer to make an ACH 35 payment without collecting a fee. 36 3.âDoes not establish electronic payment as the expected 37 form of payment. 38 4.âBefore the retail buyer agrees to make a payment by a 39 method that incurs a fee, discloses all of the following: 40 a.âThe amount of the fee to be charged under this section. 41 b.âThe retail buyerâs option to make a payment by an 42 alternative method that does not incur a fee, including by cash, 43 check, money order, or ACH payment. 44 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.